Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62J.81, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Required disclosure by health plan company. (a) A health plan company, as defined in section 62J.03, subdivision 10, shall, at the request of an enrollee intending to receive specific health care services or the enrollee's designee, provide that enrollee with a good faith estimate ofnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end the allowable amount the health plan company has contracted for with a specified provider within the network as total payment for a health care service specified by the enrollee and the portion of the allowable amount due from the enrollee and the enrollee's out-of-pocket costsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (2) the lowest allowable amount due from the enrollee as total payment for the health care service for any provider, comparable to the out-of-network provider specified by the enrollee for an out-of-network credit under section 62J.829 in (i) qualification to perform the health care service and (ii) geographic accessibility, within the network. new text end An estimate provided to an enrollee under this paragraph is not a legally binding estimate of the allowable amount or enrollee's out-of-pocket cost. (b) The information required under this subdivision must be provided by the health plan company to an enrollee within ten business days from the day a complete request was received by the health plan company. For purposes of this section, "complete request" includes all the patient and service information the health plan company requires to provide a good faith estimate, including a completed good faith estimate form if required by the health plan company. Sec. 2. new text begin [62J.829] COST-SHARING CREDIT FOR OUT-OF-NETWORK SERVICES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Estimated in-network cost difference" means the good faith estimate an enrollee receives for a service from the health plan pursuant to section 62J.81, subdivision 1a, paragraph (a), clause (2), minus the good faith estimate an enrollee receives for the service from an out-of-network provider pursuant to section 62J.81, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (c) "Out-of-network credit" means the credit required under subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Required credit. new text end new text begin (a) Subject to paragraph (d), all health plans must issue a credit to an enrollee if the enrollee: new text end new text begin (1) received a health care service from a provider outside of the health plan's network; and new text end new text begin (2) identified a positive estimated in-network cost difference for the health care service from the out-of-network provider before receiving the service. new text end new text begin (b) Subject to paragraph (d), the credit required under paragraph (a) must be equal to fifty percent of the estimated in-network cost difference. The health plan may require the enrollee to provide reasonable documentation of the good faith estimates received from the provider under section 62J.81, subdivision 1, before issuing the out-of-network credit. The health plan is prohibited from conditioning the out-of-network credit on the health plan's receipt of documentation of the good faith estimates before the enrollee receives the health care service. new text end new text begin (c) Unless a request otherwise is made to the health plan by the enrollee or the enrollee's designee, a health plan must apply an enrollee's out-of-network credit immediately, and without any required action by the enrollee, as an offset against the enrollee's next due payment obligation to the health plan until the enrollee has no available credit. new text end new text begin (d) The maximum aggregate amount of out-of-network credits an enrollee may have at any time for a single health plan is $........ A health plan is not required to issue an out-of-network credit if: new text end new text begin (1) the health care service is provided outside the United States; or new text end new text begin (2) the enrollee is delinquent on payment of premiums. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Prohibition on limiting plan designs. new text end new text begin A health plan must not impose any cost-sharing requirement, utilization review limitation, or premium increase that limits an enrollee's ability to receive, benefit from, or use an out-of-network credit. A premium increase or cost-sharing increase directly or indirectly related to the amount of an enrollee's out-of-network credit balance is considered a limit on an enrollee's ability to receive, benefit from, or use an out-of-network credit. The prohibition under this subdivision applies to an enrollee's existing plan, plan renewals, and health plan changes with the same health plan company or the company's successor. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Notice of credit balance. new text end new text begin For each enrollee with a nonzero credit balance, a health plan must provide a statement of the credit balance at least once every ... months. The statement must clearly identify the enrollee's accruals and uses of out-of-network credits within the past year and the currently available out-of-network credit balance. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Credit payment upon plan termination. new text end new text begin (a) Subject to paragraph (b), a health plan must pay an amount equal to the available out-of-network credit balance to an enrollee upon the cancellation, termination, expiration, or lapse of the health plan by the enrollee, health plan, or law. new text end new text begin (b) A health plan is not required to make the payment under paragraph (a) if the health plan is canceled, terminated, expired, or lapsed due to the enrollee's nonpayment of premiums, material misrepresentation, or fraud. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin If the application of this section before an enrollee has met their health plan's deductible would result in: (1) health savings account ineligibility under United States Code, title 26, section 223; or (2) catastrophic health plan ineligibility under United States Code, title 42, section 18022(e), this section applies only after the enrollee has met the enrollee's health plan's deductible. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin The commissioner of commerce may investigate and enforce this section using any of the authority granted to the commissioner under section 45.027. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0132, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 40. new text end new text begin Out-of-network credit balance. new text end new text begin The amount of the out-of-network credit balance paid to an enrollee under section 62J.829, subdivision 5, is a subtraction. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end